Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2430
Commission; rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out sections 76-2401 to 76-2430.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 30;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 15.